Hawaii, session 2025, SB1425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 321-225, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The advisory committee shall be composed of twenty members:  three nonvoting ex-officio members, who shall be the director of transportation, the adjutant general, and the administrator of the state health planning and development agency, or the designated representatives thereof, and seventeen members representing all counties of the State who shall be appointed by the governor subject to section 26-34 as follows: (1)  Five members who shall be physicians experienced in the conduct and delivery of emergency medical services; provided that at least two shall be engaged in the practice of emergency medicine and be board-eligible or board-certified by the American Board of Emergency Medicine, and provided further that at least one physician shall be engaged in the practice of pediatrics and be board-eligible or board-certified by the American Board of Pediatrics; (2)  Four members who shall be consumers of health care and who shall have no connection with or relationship to the health care system of the State and who shall be representative of all counties; (3)  Four members of allied health professions related to emergency medical services; and (4)  Four members, one from each county, who shall be mobile intensive care technicians or emergency medical technicians engaged in the practice of pre-hospital emergency medical service. The members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, including travel expenses.  The chairperson of the advisory committee shall be elected by the members from among their numbers.  [A majority of the members of the advisory committee] A total of seven members of the advisory committee, who have been appointed by the governor and whose terms have not expired, shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business of the advisory committee.  A majority vote of the members present at a meeting at which a quorum is established shall be necessary to validate any action of the committee." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST